Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.015

Commercial use of instrument or device—Registration—Fees.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section for the initial registration of an instrument or device, no weighing or measuring instrument or device may be used for commercial purposes in the state unless its commercial use is registered annually. If its commercial use is within a city that has a city sealer and a weights and measures program as provided by RCW 19.94.280, the commercial use of the instrument or device must be registered with the city if the city has adopted fees pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. If its commercial use is outside of such a city, the commercial use of the instrument or device must be registered with the department.

(2) A city with such a sealer and program may establish an annual fee for registering the commercial use of such a weighing or measuring instrument or device with the city. The annual fee may not exceed the fee established in RCW 19.94.175 for registering the use of a similar instrument or device with the department. Fees upon weighing or measuring instruments or devices within the jurisdiction of the city that are collected under this subsection by city sealers must be deposited into the general fund, or other account, of the city as directed by the governing body of the city.

(3) Registrations with the department are accomplished as part of the business licensing system under chapter 19.02 RCW. Payment of the registration fee for a weighing or measuring instrument or device under the business licensing system constitutes the registration required by this section.

(4) The fees established by or under RCW 19.94.175 for registering a weighing or measuring instrument or device must be paid to the department of revenue concurrently with an application for a business license under chapter 19.02 RCW or with the annual renewal of a business license under chapter 19.02 RCW. A weighing or measuring instrument or device must be initially registered with the state at the time the owner applies for a business license for a new business or at the first renewal of the license that occurs after the instrument or device is first placed into commercial use. The department of revenue must remit to the department of agriculture all fees collected under this provision less reasonable collection expenses.

(5) Each city charging registration fees under this section must notify the department of agriculture at the time such fees are adopted and whenever changes in the fees are adopted.

[ 2013 c 144 s 34. Prior: 2011 c 298 s 19; 2011 c 103 s 38; 1995 c 355 s 1.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Intent—Agency transfer—Contracting—Effective date—2011 c 298: See notes following RCW 19.02.020.

Purpose—2011 c 103: See note following RCW 15.26.120.

Application—1995 c 355: "This act applies prospectively only and not retroactively. It applies only to causes of action that arise or that are commenced on or after *the effective date of this act. This act does not affect any liability or obligation arising prior to *the effective date of this act." [ 1995 c 355 s 27.]

*Effective dates—1995 c 355: "(1) Sections 2 through 6 and 8 through 25 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1995.

(2) Sections 1 and 7 of this act shall take effect January 1, 1996." [ 1995 c 355 s 28.]